Utah statutes.
38-1a-301.   Those entitled to lien -- What may be attached.

(1)  Except as provided in Section 38-11-107, a person who provides preconstruction service or construction work on or for a project property has a lien on the project property for the reasonable value of the preconstruction service or construction work, respectively, as provided in this chapter.

(2)  A person may claim a preconstruction lien and a separate construction lien on the same project property.

(3) (a)  A construction lien may include an amount claimed for a preconstruction service.

(b)  A preconstruction lien may not include an amount claimed for construction work.

(4)  A preconstruction or construction lien attaches only to the interest that the owner has in the project property that is the subject of the lien.

